District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.24

Reports.

The Department of Employment Services shall submit quarterly reports, until January 1, 1997, on the effectiveness of outplacement services.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2424
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 601, 43 DCR 5

History

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 1-625A.4.

Prior Codifications